dictionaries/cs/index.aff
SFX A   ět          i          [aeiouyáéíóúýůě][lr]nět
SFX A   ět          ěme        [aeiouyáéíóúýůě][lr]nět
SFX A   ět          ěte        [aeiouyáéíóúýůě][lr]nět
SFX A   nět         ň          [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][lr]nět
SFX A   nět         ňme        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][lr]nět
SFX A   nět         ňte        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][lr]nět
SFX A   ět          i          [^aeiouyáéíóúýůělr]nět
SFX A   ět          ěme        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůělr]nět
SFX A   ět          ěte        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůělr]nět
SFX A   nět         ň          [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]nět
SFX A   nět         ňme        [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]nět
SFX A   nět         ňte        [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]nět
SFX A   et          ím         et
SFX A   et          íš         et
SFX A   et          í          et
SFX A   et          íme        et
SFX A   et          íte        et
SFX A   et          i          [^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl][^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]et
SFX A   t           me         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl][^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]et
SFX A   0           e          [^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl][^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]et
SFX A   t           j          [áéíóúýů][^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]et
SFX A   t           jme        [áéíóúýů][^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]et
SFX A   t           jte        [áéíóúýů][^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]et
SFX A   et          0          [aeiouyěrl][^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]et
SFX A   et          me         [aeiouyěrl][^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]et
SFX A   et          te         [aeiouyěrl][^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]et
SFX A   out         u          nout
SFX A   out         eš         nout
SFX A   out         e          nout
SFX A   out         eme        nout
SFX A   out         ete        nout
SFX A   t           0          nout
SFX A   nout        ň          [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][rl]nout
SFX A   nout        ňme        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][rl]nout
SFX A   nout        ňte        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][rl]nout
SFX A   out         i          [aeiouyáéíóúýůě][rl]nout
SFX A   out         ěme        [aeiouyáéíóúýůě][rl]nout
SFX A   out         ěte        [aeiouyáéíóúýůě][rl]nout
SFX A   nout        ň          [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]nout
SFX A   nout        ňme        [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]nout
SFX A   nout        ňte        [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]nout
SFX A   out         i          [^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl]nout
SFX A   out         ěme        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl]nout
SFX A   out         ěte        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl]nout
SFX A   out         ul         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][rl]nout
SFX A   out         ula        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][rl]nout
SFX A   out         ulo        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][rl]nout
SFX A   out         uli        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][rl]nout
SFX A   out         uly        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][rl]nout
SFX A   nout        l          [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]rnout
SFX A   nout        la         [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]rnout
SFX A   nout        lo         [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]rnout
SFX A   nout        li         [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]rnout
SFX A   nout        ly         [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]rnout
SFX A   out         ul         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]l[^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl]nout
SFX A   out         ula        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]l[^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl]nout
SFX A   out         ulo        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]l[^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl]nout
SFX A   out         uli        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]l[^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl]nout
SFX A   out         uly        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]l[^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl]nout
SFX A   nout        l          [^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl]nout
SFX A   nout        la         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl]nout
SFX A   nout        lo         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl]nout
SFX A   nout        li         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl]nout
SFX A   nout        ly         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl]nout
SFX A   out         ul         [aeiouyáéíóúýůěl]nout
SFX A   out         ula        [aeiouyáéíóúýůěl]nout
SFX A   out         ulo        [aeiouyáéíóúýůěl]nout
SFX A   out         uli        [aeiouyáéíóúýůěl]nout
SFX A   out         uly        [aeiouyáéíóúýůěl]nout
SFX A   0           a          n
SFX A   0           o          n
SFX A   0           i          n
SFX A   0           y          n
SFX A   0           a          yt
SFX A   0           o          yt
SFX A   0           i          yt
SFX A   0           y          yt
SFX A   0           a          [^o]ut
SFX A   0           o          [^o]ut
SFX A   0           i          [^o]ut
SFX A   0           y          [^o]ut
SFX A   0           i          [^coy]t
SFX A   t           i          ct
SFX A   i           t          ci
SFX A   íst         etls       číst #přidané hovorové tvary minulého času
SFX A   íst         etlas      číst
SFX A   íst         etlos      číst
SFX A   íst         ětls       [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ětlas      [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         ětlos      [dnt]íst
SFX A   íst         edls       [^čdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         edlas      [^čdnt]íst
SFX A   íst         edlos      [^čdnt]íst
SFX A   ést         esls       nést
SFX A   ést         eslas      nést
SFX A   ést         eslos      nést
SFX A   ést         etls       [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         etlas      [^n]ést
SFX A   ést         etlos      [^n]ést
SFX A   ást         adls       ást
SFX A   ást         adlas      ást
SFX A   ást         adlos      ást
SFX A   ézt         ezls       ézt
SFX A   ézt         ezlas      ézt
SFX A   ézt         ezlos      ézt
SFX A   át          als        át
SFX A   át          alas       át
SFX A   át          alos       át
SFX A   éct         ekls       [^l]éc[it]
SFX A   éct         eklas      [^l]éc[it]
SFX A   éct         eklos      [^l]éc[it]
SFX A   ct          kls        ouc[it]
SFX A   ct          klas       ouc[it]
SFX A   ct          klos       ouc[it]
SFX A   ci          hls        oc[it]
SFX A   ci          hlas       oc[it]
SFX A   ci          hlos       oc[it]
SFX A   t           ls         [^áíouyýcsz]t
SFX A   t           las        [^áíouyýcsz]t
SFX A   t           los        [^áíouyýcsz]t
SFX A   ít          ils        [^čř]ít
SFX A   ít          ilas       [^čř]ít
SFX A   ít          ilos       [^čř]ít
SFX A   ít          els        řít
SFX A   ít          elas       řít
SFX A   ít          elos       řít
SFX A   ít          als        čít
SFX A   ít          alas       čít
SFX A   ít          alos       čít
SFX A   out         uls        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][rl]nout
SFX A   out         ulas       [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][rl]nout
SFX A   out         ulos       [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě][rl]nout
SFX A   nout        ls         [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]rnout
SFX A   nout        las        [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]rnout
SFX A   nout        los        [aeiouyáéíóúýůě]rnout
SFX A   out         uls        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]l[^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl]nout
SFX A   out         ulas       [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]l[^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl]nout
SFX A   out         ulos       [^aeiouyáéíóúýůě]l[^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl]nout
SFX A   nout        ls         [^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl]nout
SFX A   nout        las        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl]nout
SFX A   nout        los        [^aeiouyáéíóúýůěrl]nout
SFX A   out         uls        [aeiouyáéíóúýůěl]nout
SFX A   out         ulas       [aeiouyáéíóúýůěl]nout
SFX A   out         ulos       [aeiouyáéíóúýůěl]nout
