dictionaries/cs/index.dic
aktivovat/ATN
aportovat/ATN
bagrovat/ATN
blažit/ATN
boxovat/ATN
buntovat/ATN
cepenět/AJTN
chrčet/AN
ctitelka/ZA
debutovat/AN
dekrementovat/ATN
deprivovat/ATN
digitalizovat/ATN
dmýchávat/ATN
dobubnovat/ATN
docvrčet/AN
doeliminovat/ATN
dohledět/AN
dohušťovat/ATN
doklučit/ATN
dokrajovat/ATN
dokňučet/AN
doluštit/ATN
domrazit/ATN
doomračovat/ATN
doplazit/AN
doprivatizovat/ATN
doradovat/AN
dosahovat/ATN
dosnít/ATN
dostřihnout/ACN
dotisknout/ACTN
dotáčet/AJTN
dovoskovat/ATN
doxeroxovat/ATN
dočárnout/AN
došlápnout/ATN
dramatizovat/ATN
dunět/AN
editovat/ATN
exhalovat/ATN
favorizovat/ATN
formalizovat/ATN
gemovat/ATN
hanobit/ATN
hloupnout/AN
hospodařit/ATN
hubačit/AN
háčkovat/ATN
indikovat/ATN
intenzivnět/AJTN
jankovat/AN
kamarádit/AN
kecnout/ATN
klopotit/AN
kolektivizovat/ATN
konejšit/ATN
konzumovat/ATN
kouskovat/ATN
krosčekovat/ATN
kupit/ATN
kápnout/ATN
lajnovat/ATN
levitovat/ATN
louhovat/ATN
madeirizovat/ATN
meandrovat/AN
mlátit/ACN
mrzačit/ATN
mířit/ATN
nabuzovat/ATN
nadekretovat/ATN
nadsazovat/ATN
nafotit/ACN
naimportovat/ATN
naklábosit/AN
nakrájet/AJTN
nalaminovat/ATN
nalíčit/ATN
namísit/ACN
naplavat/AN
napražit/ATN
narežírovat/ATN
naskytnout/AN
nastrojit/ATN
natahovat/ATN
navalit/ATN
navyvádět/AN
načmárnout/ATN
našpendlit/ATN
neprat/AT
následovat/ATN
obhospodařit/ATN
oblepit/ATN
obodovat/ATN
obstupovat/ATN
obílit/ATN
ochromit/ATN
odbočit/ATN
oddechnout/ATN
odfičet/AN
odhopkovat/AN
odkliknout/AN
odkrvovat/ATN
odletět/ATN
odmašírovat/ATN
odnacifikovat/ATN
odplevelovat/ATN
odpravovat/ATN
odrolit/ATN
odsoudit/ACN
odsunout/ATN
odtušit/ATN
odvodit/ACN
odznačovat/ATN
odšifrovat/ATN
ofotografovat/ATN
ohvězdičkovat/ATN
okrašlovat/ATN
olízat/AJTN
onanovat/AN
oplodnit/ATN
opravovovat/ATN
orientovat/ATN
oslovit/ATN
osvobodit/ACN
otrhnout/AN
ověšovat/ATN
očarovat/ATN
ošpendlovat/ATN
panáčkovat/AN
pausovat/ATN
pinožit/AN
plyšovat/ATN
pochlubit/ATN
podepřít/ATN
podlétnout/AN
podrtit/ACN
podtéct/AN
poevropštit/ATN
pohrdnout/AN
pokonversovat/AN
pokývnout/AN
polstrovat/ATN
pomátnout/ATN
pootevřít/ATN
poprašovat/ATN
porámusit/AN
posterizovat/ATN
posvěcovat/ATN
poukazovat/ATN
povyskočit/AN
pozměňovat/ATN
poškádlit/ATN
preformovat/ATN
prochrnět/AJTN
profesionalizovat/ATN
prohrabovat/ATN
proklusat/AJN
prokvasit/ACN
promasírovat/ATN
pronést/ATN
propracovat/ATN
proslazovat/ATN
prostřít/ATN
protrhnout/ACN
provzdušit/ATN
prořídnout/AN
pružit/AN
páchnout/AN
přebreptnout/ATN
předcvičit/ATN
předkulit/ATN
předprogramovat/ATN
předtrhnout/ACN
předěrovat/ATN
přehlédnout/ATXN
překartáčovat/ATN
překračovat/ATN
překřičet/ATN
přeléčit/ATN
přeměřovat/ATN
přeplnit/ATN
přepěnit/ATN
přeslabikovat/ATN
přestříknout/ATN
přetransformovat/ATN
převekslovat/ATN
přezbrojit/ATN
přeřídit/ACN
přežhavit/ATN
přidržovat/ATN
přiklapnout/AJTN
přikrášlit/ATN
přimastit/ACN
připažit/ATN
připotácet/AJN
přisnít/ATN
přisvědčit/ATN
přivazovat/ATN
přizdobit/ATN
přišoupnout/ATN
radovat/AN
reemulgovat/ATN
rekriminovat/ATN
resocializovat/ATN
riskovat/ATN
rozbočovat/ATN
rozdloubat/AJTN
rozesmutnit/AN
rozhlásit/ACN
rozjiskřit/AN
rozkrojit/ATN
rozlisovat/ATN
rozmnožovat/ATN
roznítit/ACN
rozplozovat/ATN
rozpéct/ATN
rozsoudit/ACN
roztrhovat/ATN
rozveslovat/AN
rozvážit/ATN
rozřadit/ACTN
rozšroubovat/ATN
rybinovat/ATN
sblížit/ATN
sdružovat/ATN
seprat/ATN
sestřelovat/ATN
seškrabat/AJTN
sfúzovat/AN
sjezdovat/AN
skobičkovat/ATN
slabikovat/ATN
slučovat/ATN
smočit/ATN
snožovat/ATN
spalovat/ATN
spojit/ATN
spoluúčastnit/ATN
spříst/ATN
stimulovat/ATN
strážit/ATN
stříbřit/ATN
svařovat/ATN
svěřit/ATN
sřetězit/ATN
termínovat/ATN
tonizovat/ATN
trhnout/ATN
tušit/ATN
třásňovat/ATN
uchladit/ACN
udržovat/ATN
uháčkovat/ATN
ukotvovat/ATN
uleknout/AN
umoudřit/AN
unést/ATN
upozorňovat/ATN
urvat/ATN
usmažit/ATN
ustrnout/AN
utlumit/ATN
utřísnit/ATN
uvěznit/ATN
uřvat/AN
uždibovat/ATN
vdupnout/AJTN
vhlédnout/AN
vkroužit/AN
vmazat/ATN
vpašovat/ATN
vrubovat/ATN
vtknout/AJTN
vybláznit/ATN
vybělit/ATN
vycítit/ATN
vydrápat/AJTN
vyfouknout/ATN
vyholovat/ATN
vyhvízdnout/ATN
vykleštit/ATN
vykoulet/AJTN
vykurýrovat/ATN
vylicitovat/ATN
vylítnout/AN
vymycovat/ATN
vynulovat/ATN
vyplavovat/ATN
vypotit/ACN
vyprášit/ATN
vyretušovat/ATN
vyskladňovat/ATN
vyspekulovat/ATN
vystupňovat/ATN
vysyknout/ATN
vytrasovat/ATN
vytřepat/AJTN
vyvolit/ATN
vyzdobit/ATN
vyúčtovat/ATN
vyřítit/AN
vyšpiclovat/ATN
vzdalovat/ATN
vzpomenout/ATN
včesat/AJTN
vžehlovat/ATN
zablýsknout/AN
zabydlit/AN
zachytnout/ATN
zadrnčet/AN
zafučet/AN
zahmyzit/ATN
zahušťovat/ATN
zakabonit/ATN
zakomentovat/ATN
zakrsnout/AN
zakódovat/ATN
zalichotit/ACN
zamezit/ATN
zamířit/ATN
zaokrouhlovat/ATN
zaplavovat/ATN
zaprotestovat/ATN
zarachotit/AN
zarýpat/AJTN
zasnoubit/ATN
zastřešovat/ATN
zatančit/ATN
zatrhovat/ATN
zavadnout/ATN
zavrhnout/ACN
zazdít/ATN
začlenit/ATN
zaškolovat/ATN
zaštiťovat/ATN
zblbnout/ATN
zbídačit/ATN
zdecimovat/ATN
zdrbat/AJTN
zdůslednit/ATN
zestátnit/ATN
zfiltrovat/ATN
zhoršovat/ATN
zhřešit/AN
zjednoznačňovat/ATN
zkolabovat/AN
zkoordinovat/ATN
zkrvavit/ATN
zledovatět/AJN
zmapovat/ATN
zmírňovat/ATN
znesvěcovat/ATN
zněkolikanásobovat/ATN
zploštit/ATN
zprůhlednět/AJTN
zreorganizovat/ATN
ztupovat/ATN
zvrátit/ACN
zčeřovat/ATN
čoudit/ACN
šklíbit/AN
štukovat/ATN
žvýknout/ATN
